Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1207.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; study; U.S. Route 60 and State Route 303 The sum of $150,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to conduct a study to assess financing mechanisms for new development to support regional and statewide transportation infrastructure along U.S. Route 60 and State Route 303.